Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 3. Child Support

§ 20-2-301.
Purpose.

Where necessary and appropriate, the court shall enter orders, whether temporary or permanent, pursuant to and in compliance with this article for the maintenance of children in actions for divorce, annulment, paternity, support, out-of-home placement and any other action for the maintenance or support of children.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Many of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Meaning of “this article.” —

For definition of “this article,” referred to in this section, see § 20-2-303(a)(iv).

Temporary and permanent support orders proper.—

District court acted well within its statutory authority and discretion when it ordered temporary child support appropriate to circumstances during the proceedings, and then issued a permanent child support order, effective as of the last day of the trial; the retroactive child support order seemed particularly reasonable in this case where the final decree was necessarily delayed by father’s ill-fated, post-trial attempt to undermine mother’s fitness. Bruce v. Bruce, 2021 WY 38, 482 P.3d 328,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2021).

Custody and support inseparable. —

Upon a hearing for change of custody, the trial court is obliged to consider all its aspects and make provision for adequate support. Custody implies a consideration of the obligation of support. The two — custody and provision for support — are inseparable. Rose v. Rose, 576 P.2d 458,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1978).

Decision will not be disturbed on appeal unless discretion abused. —

Decisions regarding child support rest largely within the discretion of the district court, and its decision in that regard will not be disturbed on appeal except for grave abuse of that discretion or violation of some legal principle. Harrington v. Harrington, 660 P.2d 356,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1983). See also Ayling v. Ayling, 661 P.2d 1054,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1983); Roberts v. Vilos, 776 P.2d 216,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1989); CSP v. DDC, 842 P.2d 528,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1992).

Modification of child support within discretion of court. —

The propriety of child support and maintenance and the determination relative to the amount thereof is within the discretion of the trial court and may be modified by the court as the circumstances require. Booker v. Booker, 626 P.2d 561,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo. 1981).

But is separate and distinct case. —

A modification proceeding involves new issues framed by facts differing from those existing when the original decree was entered. A new adjudication of the rights of the parties must be made. For all intents and purposes it is a separate and distinct case from the original proceeding. Leitner v. Lonabaugh, 402 P.2d 713,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1965).

And judge disqualified in original proceeding vested with jurisdiction to try new issues. —

A presiding judge, though disqualified in original divorce proceeding pursuant to Rule 40.1(b), W.R.C.P., is vested with jurisdiction to try new issues and enter decree modifying custody provisions of original decree in the absence of his being disqualified anew. Leitner v. Lonabaugh, 402 P.2d 713,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1965).

Court may not, of its own initiative, modify its own order

with respect to, among other things, a child support obligation absent a proper petition by one of the parents requesting such modification. Connors v. Connors, 769 P.2d 336,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1989).

Retrospective ratification of oral modification of support agreement

is improper where agreement is not timely submitted to district court for ratification and the State, which became a party to the agreement upon assignment of rights to support payments by custodial parent, did not agree to retrospective ratification of the modification agreement. Department of Family Servs. v. Peterson, 957 P.2d 1307,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1998).

Later petition to establish support allowed. —

When the original divorce decree and subsequent modifications do not contain any references to child support, a later petition to establish support is not a “motion to modify,” although it may be improvidently so labeled. It is merely ancillary or supplemental to the main cause, and it is not necessary that a determination on the motion be based on a change in circumstance. The standard for establishing, rather than modifying, child support should apply. Warren v. Hart, 747 P.2d 511,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 566

(Wyo. 1987).

Since provisions in original divorce decree pertaining to child support were void, subsequent proceedings were for purpose of establishment rather than modification of child support, and were thus not precluded by subdivision (a) of this section. Thomas v. Thomas, 983 P.2d 717,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1999).

Court granted jurisdiction to provide for children's support when necessary. —

Subsection (a) grants the district court jurisdiction to provide for the support of the children of divorced parents when the need for support is necessary. Such power is conferred upon the court notwithstanding the age of the child. Kamp v. Kamp, 640 P.2d 48,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1982).

Continuing jurisdiction as to child support. —

An application to enforce the provisions of a decree in an action for a divorce concerning the support of a child is a supplementary proceeding incidental to the original suit. The court has a continuing jurisdiction in this respect. Erb v. Erb, 573 P.2d 849,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1978).

The obligation of support bestowed by subsection (a) impliedly becomes a part of every divorce decree involving the welfare of the children of a marriage and the trial court has a continuing jurisdiction to modify. Rose v. Rose, 576 P.2d 458,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1978).

District court had no authority to retrospectively modify decree of divorce

with respect to child support; although prior to the 1987 amendment, this section did not specifically prohibit retrospective modifications, the 1987 amendment merely codified the common law as it existed in Wyoming. Parry v. Parry, 766 P.2d 1168,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1989).

Child support order reflects what parent can reasonably be expected to pay. —

A child support order may not accurately reflect what the children actually require but only what the parent can reasonably be expected to pay. Redman v. Redman, 521 P.2d 584,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1974).

Insurance coverage as part of divorce decree. —

District court correctly determined that the reason father no longer had dental insurance on child was not relevant where father claimed he had removed child at mother's request, and court correctly found father's failure to maintain coverage was a violation of divorce decree requiring he maintain coverage. Harris v. Harris, 948 P.2d 405,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1997).

Obligation of support is a continuing one under this section.

Redman v. Redman, 521 P.2d 584,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1974); Rose v. Rose, 576 P.2d 458,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1978).

Which is subject to change contingent on change in circumstances. —

The obligation of support is at all times subject to change upon proper request to the court for modification or clarification contingent upon a change in circumstances of the parties. Redman v. Redman, 521 P.2d 584,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1974).

Decree creates sequential judgments. —

In the absence of a statute, a decree for periodic payments of child support creates sequential judgments enforceable under the statutory procedures for enforcement of judgments. Hollingshead v. Hollingshead, 942 P.2d 1104,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1997).

Where a mother did not execute on periodic child support payments within five years of their becoming due, the judgments became dormant, subject to revival within 21 years. Hollingshead v. Hollingshead, 942 P.2d 1104,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1997).

Change in circumstances need not be unforeseeable. —

A substantial change in circumstances is required to modify a divorce decree, but the change need not be an unforeseeable one. Mentock v. Mentock, 638 P.2d 156,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 408

(Wyo. 1981).

Denial of visitation rights not change in circumstances. —

The denial of visitation rights by either the custodial parent or the child does not constitute a change in circumstances justifying the reduction or termination of the noncustodial parent's support obligation. A child's need for support and a parent's ability to pay are not related to questions concerning visitation. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Lack of visitation and negative feelings not to be considered. —

Lack of visitation and negative feelings between a noncustodial parent and child are not proper factors that a court may consider in determining whether to deviate from the presumptive support guidelines; such consideration is, therefore, an abuse of discretion. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Offset not permitted. —

The trial court did not abuse its discretion in concluding that a father's child support payments could not be offset against the parties' original property settlement. Rocha v. Rocha, 925 P.2d 231,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1996).

Operating under monthly deficit not enough to free party from support obligation.

The noncustodial parent's desired standard of living cannot determine his ability to pay. However, capacity to contribute must be recognized as a physical fact and a legal requirement. Nuspl v. Nuspl, 717 P.2d 341,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 527

(Wyo. 1986).

When inflation important factor. —

In a proceeding to modify a support decree, inflation could be a proper factor for consideration under circumstances in which it had a substantial and disproportionate effect on the relative financial position of the parties' contribution to support. Mentock v. Mentock, 638 P.2d 156,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 408

(Wyo. 1981).

Voluntary assumption of costs insufficient grounds for modification. —

The voluntary assumption of the costs of a new home and a family after a divorce decree and property settlement agreement are not the changes in circumstances which normally require a modification of the decree. Booker v. Booker, 626 P.2d 561,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo. 1981).

Modification with changing needs of children. —

Proof of increased income is not, of itself, sufficient to show substantial change in circumstances justifying modification of a divorce decree as related to child support. The needs of the children, and not the standard of living desired by the custodial parent, is the issue. Harrington v. Harrington, 660 P.2d 356,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1983).

Discovery permitted. —

When one petitions for modification of child support, normally discovery should be allowed with respect to the assets of the other party and information relating to the needs of the children. Failure to permit such discovery has been held to be reversible error. Hinckley v. Hinckley, 812 P.2d 907,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1991).

In refusing to allow the father, in connection with a petition for modification of child support, to discover relevant evidence relating to any changes in the financial circumstances of his ex-wife since the entry of the divorce decree, the district court abused its discretion. Cubin v. Cubin, 685 P.2d 680,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1984).

Father's disability payments considered by court. —

Social security disability payments awarded, post divorce, for the benefit of a father's disability, as a matter of law, do not constitute satisfaction of child support payments required by the divorce decree. The receipt of such benefits by the children is one factor to be considered by the court in making its determination as to whether a significant, material change of circumstances has occurred that is sufficient to justify modification of a noncustodial parent's obligation for support. The party obligated to make those payments has an affirmative duty to seek modification of the support order. Hinckley v. Hinckley, 812 P.2d 907,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1991).

As are children's social security benefits. —

The fact that children become entitled to receive social security benefits is not the exclusive factor for the court to consider in ruling upon a petition for modification. A determination of the amounts of child support that are appropriate in an instance in which modification is sought due to a change in circumstances requires a consideration of the needs of the children, the ability of the father to contribute to those needs and his responsibility to do so, and the ability of the mother to contribute to those needs and her responsibility to do so. Hinckley v. Hinckley, 812 P.2d 907,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1991).

But benefits not applied to prior obligation. —

The application of a lump sum payment of social security benefits, that the obligor's children received after the determination was made of his entitlement to benefits, to a prior support obligation would have amounted to a retrospective modification of the support obligation, and was forbidden by statute. Hinckley v. Hinckley, 812 P.2d 907,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1991).

Undivided child support order should not be regarded as equally divisible. —

To regard an undivided child support order as equally divisible among the children is to ignore the fact that the requirements of the individual children may vary widely, depending on the circumstances. Redman v. Redman, 521 P.2d 584,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1974).

Making an allowance for four children without specifying the amount considered necessary for each child does not mean that the decree must be construed as constituting a severable decree. Redman v. Redman, 521 P.2d 584,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1974).

Where court terminated support toward one child. —

Fact that court found that father was not liable for support of child who had reached 18 years of age and reduced his monthly payments accordingly did not establish that his child support obligations towards his other three children under an undivided child support order ended upon each child becoming 18. Redman v. Redman, 521 P.2d 584,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1974).

Substantial change in circumstances justified modification. —

The court did not abuse its discretion when it found that a substantial change in wife's monthly financial circumstances, two months after the original decree was entered, justified a modification of the decree. Lewis v. Lewis, 716 P.2d 347,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 519

(Wyo. 1986).

No “substantial change” where stipulated amount. —

The district court could reasonably conclude that there was not a “material and substantial change” in the husband's average income where he stipulated to the amount for child support as contained in the decree — and had agreed to an even greater amount in the original stipulation. Esponda v. Esponda, 796 P.2d 799,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1990).

Construction of conditions in modification decree. —

Conditions in a modification decree, if possible, are to be construed not to operate as a forfeiture of the rights of parties. Leitner v. Lonabaugh, 402 P.2d 713,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1965).

Condition met by substantial performance. —

The condition of a modification decree requiring husband to be “current” in his support payments was met by substantial performance in good faith. Leitner v. Lonabaugh, 402 P.2d 713,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1965).

Parent has duty to support incapacitated child

even though the child has reached the age of majority. Kamp v. Kamp, 640 P.2d 48,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1982).

Contempt. —

District court did not err in finding former husband in contempt and accepting court commissioner's determinations that husband had not paid former wife's moving costs or maintained dental insurance for child as ordered by divorce decree and that husband was in arrears for child support and alimony. Harris v. Harris, 948 P.2d 405,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1997).

Statutory attorney liens may not be asserted against child support. —

As a matter of public policy, statutory attorney liens may not be asserted against monies which represent payments for child support because the custodial parent does not own the child support payments received from the clerk of court, but rather such support payments belong to the minor children, and because the custodial parent, rather than the children, owes a debt to the attorney. Sue Davidson, P.C. v. Naranjo, 904 P.2d 354,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited in

Knezovich v. Knezovich, 2015 WY 6,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Jan. 8, 2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Support provisions of judicial decree or order as limit of father's liability for expenses of child, 7 ALR2d 491.

Father's liability for support of child furnished after entry of decree of divorce not providing for support, 69 ALR2d 203, 91 ALR3d 530.

Allocation or apportionment of previous combined award of alimony and child support, 78 ALR2d 1110.

Change in financial condition or needs of parents or children as ground for modification of decree for child support payments, 89 ALR2d 7.

Remarriage as basis for modification of amount of child support provision of divorce decree, 89 ALR2d 106.

Propriety and effect of undivided award for support of more than one person, 2 ALR3d 596.

What voluntary acts of child, other than marriage or entry into military service, terminate parent's obligation to support, 32 ALR3d 1055.

Income of child from other source as excusing parent's compliance with support provisions of divorce decree, 39 ALR3d 1292.

Wife's possession of independent means as affecting her right to allowance for support of her children, 60 ALR3d 719.

Power of court to modify decree for support of children based on agreement of the parties, 61 ALR3d 511.

Father's liability for support of child furnished after divorce decree which awarded custody to mother but made no provision for support, 91 ALR3d 530.

Propriety of decree in proceeding between divorced parents to determine mother's duty to pay support for children in custody of father, 98 ALR3d 1146.

Responsibility of noncustodial divorced parent to pay for, or contribute to, costs of child's college education, 99 ALR3d 322.

Validity and effect, as between former spouses, of agreement releasing parent from payment of child support provided for in an earlier divorce decree, 100 ALR3d 1129.

Validity and enforceability of escalation clause in divorce decree relating to alimony and child support, 19 ALR4th 830.

Excessiveness or adequacy of money awarded as child support, 27 ALR4th 864.

What constitutes “extraordinary” or similar medical or dental expenses for purposes of divorce decree requiring one parent to pay such expenses for child in custody of other parent, 39 ALR4th 502.

Stepparent's postdivorce duty to support stepchild, 44 ALR4th 520.

Court's authority to reinstitute parent's support obligation after terms of prior decree have been fulfilled, 48 ALR4th 952.

Right to attorneys' fees in proceeding, after absolute divorce, for modification of child custody or support order, 57 ALR4th 710.

Withholding visitation rights for failure to make alimony or support payments, 65 ALR4th 1155.

Divorce and separation: attributing undisclosed income to parent or spouse for purposes of making child- or spousal-support award, 70 ALR4th 173.

State court's authority, in marital or child custody proceeding, to allocate federal income tax dependency exemption for child to noncustodial parent under § 152(e) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 USC § 152(e)), 77 ALR4th 786.

What constitutes order made pursuant to state domestic relations law for purposes of qualified domestic relations order exception to antialienation provision of Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 USC § 1056(d)), 79 ALR4th 1081.

Parent's child support liability as affected by other parent's fraudulent misrepresentation regarding sterility or use of birth control, or refusal to abort pregnancy, 2 ALR5th 337.

Loss of income due to incarceration as affecting child support obligation, 27 ALR5th 540.

Treatment of depreciation expenses claimed for tax or accounting purposes in determining ability to pay child or spousal support, 28 ALR5th 46.

Right to credit on child support payments for social security or other government dependency payments made for benefit of child, 34 ALR5th 447.

Support provisions of judicial decree or order as limit of parent's liability for expenses of child, 35 ALR5th 757.

Alimony or child-support awards as subject to attorneys' liens, 49 ALR5th 595.

Right to credit on child support arrearages for time parties resided together after separation or divorce, 104 ALR5th 605.

Right to credit against child support arrearages for time child spent in custody of noncustodial parent, other than for visitation or under court order, without custodial parent's approval, 108 ALR5th 359.

Right to credit against child support arrearages for time children spent in custody of noncustodial parent pursuant to visitation or court order, 118 ALR 5th 385.

Right to credit on child-support arrearages for money given directly to child, 119 ALR 5th 445.

Right to credit against child support arrearages for time child lived with noncustodial parent, other than for visitation or by court order, with approval of custodial parent, 120 ALR 5th 229.

Right to credit on child support for contributions to housing costs, utility bills, and other alleged household necessities made for child's benefit while child is not living with obligor parent, 123 ALR 5th 565.

Right to credit on child support arrearages for gifts to child, 124 ALR 5th 441.

§ 20-2-302.
Applicability.

This article applies to all orders for the support or maintenance of children.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1.

Meaning of “this article.” —

For definition of “this article,” referred to in this section, see § 20-2-303(a)(iv).

§ 20-2-303.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Age of majority” means as defined in W.S. 14-1-101(a) or 14-2-204(a), whichever is applicable;

“Income” means any form of payment or return in money or in kind to an individual, regardless of source. Income includes, but is not limited to wages, earnings, salary, commission, compensation as an independent contractor, temporary total disability, permanent partial disability and permanent total disability worker’s compensation payments, unemployment compensation, disability, annuity and retirement benefits, and any other payments made by any payor, but shall not include any earnings derived from overtime work unless the court, after considering all overtime earnings derived in the preceding twenty-four (24) month period, determines the overtime earnings can reasonably be expected to continue on a consistent basis. In determining income, all reasonable unreimbursed legitimate business expenses shall be deducted. Means tested sources of income such as Pell grants, aid under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program, supplemental nutrition assistance program and supplemental security income (SSI) shall not be considered as income. Gross income also means potential income of parents who are voluntarily unemployed or underemployed;

“Net income” means income as defined in paragraph (ii) of this subsection less personal income taxes, social security deductions, cost of dependent health care coverage for all dependent children, actual payments being made under preexisting support orders for current support of other children, other court-ordered support obligations currently being paid and mandatory pension deductions. Payments towards child support arrearage shall not be deducted to arrive at net income;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 225, § 1; Laws 1990, ch. 60, § 2; Laws 1993, ch. 184, § 1; Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

20-6-301

; Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 2; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance program” for “food stamps” in the last sentence in (a)(ii).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(iv), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

20-2-301

through

20-2-315

."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Means tested income.—

District court properly excluded Massachusetts “CASH” benefits from mother’s income calculations because it qualified as means tested income; the phrase “such as” - akin to the term “includes” - is enlarging, not exclusive, and mother explained her income had to be below a certain amount to qualify for state benefits. Bruce v. Bruce, 2021 WY 38, 482 P.3d 328,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2021).

Calculation of husband’s net income.—

District court did not abuse its discretion when it included depreciation in a father’s income because the court’s calculations were supported by the record and did not exceed the bounds of reason. Furthermore, the district court did not abuse its discretion by adding certain distributions from a limited liability company established by the father and the father’s then wife to the father’s income. Marquis v. Marquis, 2020 WY 141, 476 P.3d 212,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2020).

Imputed income. —

Child support award erred because the court found a father was voluntarily underemployed based on overtime income the father had earned more than 24 months prior to trial without finding the overtime income would continue. Johnson v. Johnson, 2020 WY 18, 458 P.3d 27,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2020).

Mother's motion
to modify child support was properly denied because she was voluntarily
unemployed from January to November 2013; she was able to earn the
income imputed to her during this time period because she had active
medical licenses in multiple states. She did not claim that her employment
away from Wyoming prevented her from exercising visitation with the
children, and her personality conflicts with colleagues that resulted
in her leaving employment positions were not relevant as to whether
she was able to find employment. Levene v. Levene, 2014 WY 161, 340 P.3d 270,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2014).

Mother was not entitled to modification of child support because the trial court properly imputed income to the mother based on the mother’s work history and her representation that she would be returning to work in one to two months. Snowden v. Jaure, 2021 WY 103, 495 P.3d 882,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2021).

Calculation of husband’s net income. —

In the parties' divorce, the trial court erred in determining the husband's net income because it was required to use the statutory definitions of “income” and “net income” rather than the arbitrary number associated with the amount he tithed to his church. Bagley v. Bagley, 2013 WY 126, 311 P.3d 141,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2013).

Parties' income was properly calculated for purposes of child support modification because (1) it was not an abuse of discretion to deduct the mother's home office expenses, and (2) the court did not have to average the father's fluctuating income. Zupan v. Zupan, 2016 WY 78, 377 P.3d 770,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2016).

District court,
which used the father's federal tax information to ascertain his income
and added depreciation back to the adjusted gross income figure on
the father's return, acted within its discretion in calculating the
father's net income as it did for child support purposes; the district
court correctly calculated the presumptive level of support by considering
the parties' most recent income information as representative of their current earning ability, consistent with case law. Ackerman v. Ott, 2014 WY 93, 330 P.3d 271,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2014).

Relation to other statutes. —

District court
cannot simply sign off on a stipulated decree deviating from the
guidelines
when Title XIX Medicaid coverage benefits are being paid
for the benefit
of children; however, a court is not precluded from
ordering a deviation
downward from the presumed child support amount
after making appropriate
findings if a party has any of the means-tested
sources of income
referred to. District court may use its discretion
and consider whether
a deviation is appropriate, even when means
tested sources of income
are being paid on behalf of any of the children;
this interpretation
is consistent with other child support statutes. Dellit v. Tracy, 2015 WY 153, 362 P.3d 353,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2015).

Income includes “contribution.” —

Monthly “contribution,” for use of first floor of father's house as a residence for the poor, was income for purposes of calculating father's child support obligation. Fountain v. Mitros, 968 P.2d 934,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 5, 1999).

Imputed income. —

Where mother voluntarily left her teaching position and was a second-year law student with zero income, district court could reasonably find she was voluntarily unemployed, and could impute her income from prior years. KC v. KJM (In re IC), 971 P.2d 603,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1999).

Uncertain historical gifts excluded from “income.” —

The court is afforded discretion to include or not include historical gifts as a source of income and may rule that gifts to a spouse were so uncertain as to preclude their inclusion in a calculation of monthly income. Triggs v. Triggs, 920 P.2d 653,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Trial court's award of child support was proper because it took into consideration the statutory factors, including decisions to impute income, how the fact that the children were still living in the mother's home impacted her ability to work, and that the father did not show that deviation was appropriate. Stevens v. Stevens, 2014 WY 23, 318 P.3d 802,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2014).

Deferred compensation is not “income.” —

The amount withheld from the father's pay for deferred compensation was not income under the child support guidelines, because deferred compensation is not a “payment or return in money or in kind” to the father when it is paid into a fund for his later benefit. Ahearn v. Ahearn, 993 P.2d 942,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1999).

Mortgage interest. —

District court did not abuse its discretion by not allowing a father to deduct mortgage interest to determine his income for purposes of calculating child support, where the father did not provide the customary Form 1098s documenting the mortgage interest he claimed. Lemus v. Martinez, 2021 WY 66, 486 P.3d 1000,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2021).

Deduction of business expenses. —

District court did not err in refusing to deduct defendant's purported business expenses in calculating child support; defendant relied almost exclusively on deductions appearing in his federal income tax return, which did not excuse him from responsibility of showing that deductions were reasonable and appropriate. Roseman v. Sackett, 979 P.2d 940,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1999).

The principal portion of a business mortgage payment may be deductible if, in its discretion, the district court determines that the payment reasonably and legitimately reduces net income for child support purposes. Fleenor v. Fleenor, 992 P.2d 1065,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1999).

Appellate court held if in computing child support, a trial court automatically rejected a business expense that had been afforded 26 USCS § 179 treatment, that court had not fulfilled its obligation under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-303(a)(ii) to determine whether the amount should be deducted as a reasonable and legitimate business expense. Watson v. Watson, 2002 WY 180, 60 P.3d 124,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 218

(Wyo. 2002).

Social security dependency benefits properly considered. —

Because dependency benefits represent an amount earned through a parent's contributions to the social security program, it is proper to include those amounts in the disabled parent's income. Groenstein v. Groenstein, 2005 WY 6, 104 P.3d 765,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2005).

Federal tax return not inappropriate for determining child support. —

It was not an abuse of discretion for the trial court, under this section, to use the most recent tax returns for determining income; defendant father's tax refund could be considered as affecting cash flow. Ready v. Ready, 2003 WY 121, 76 P.3d 836,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2003).

Federal income tax computations differ significantly. —

Because federal income tax computations differ in significant respects from the computations required by this section, the district court erred in substituting the federal income tax concepts to arrive at the presumptive child support amounts under former §

20-6-304

(now see §

20-2-304

). Houston v. Smith, 882 P.2d 240,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1994).

Applied

in

Durham v. Durham, 2003 WY 95, 74 P.3d 1230,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

Pasenelli v. Pasenelli, 2002 WY 159, 57 P.3d 324,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Underkofler v. Underkofler, 834 P.2d 1140,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1992).

Focus in determining income. —

It is clear from case law that the focus for determining income should be upon the reasonable and legitimate nature of the expense and its impact on the party's actual cash flow in the year in question rather than the treatment of the expense by federal law in the context of income taxes. Ackerman v. Ott, 2014 WY 93, 330 P.3d 271,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2014).